Illinois, session 104th, HB2876.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Flag Display Act is amended by changing 5Section 1 and by adding Section 12 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 465/1)  (from Ch. 1, par. 3301)7    Sec. 1. It shall be the duty of each county board to 8provide United States national flags of not less than four by 9eight feet in size, to be unfurled and kept floating from a 10suitable flag-staff to be placed on the top of the court house 11in its respective county, and it is hereby made the duty of the 12sheriff of each and every county in the State to see that the 13flag so provided shall be hoisted on its flag-staff above the 14court house and kept floating from eight o'clock a.m. to five 15o'clock p.m. on each and every legal holiday of the year, and 16on such other days as the county board may direct.17    The county board may provide for the display of an MIA flag 18at the court house in its county, either upon the same 19flag-staff as the United States national flag or otherwise. 20(Source: P.A. 93-697, eff. 7-9-04.) 21    (5 ILCS 465/12 new)22    Sec. 12. Other flags prohibited. No State institution,   HB2876- 2 -LRB104 09831 BDA 19899 b1including public school buildings, shall display any flags 2other than the national flag of the United States and the flag 3of the State of Illinois.